Massachusetts, session 194th, H4353.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after Section 10H the following section:-
Section 10H 1/2. The office of Medicaid in consultation with the Center for Health
Information and Analysis shall bi-annually conduct a review of the rates used by all
governmental units in making payments to eligible providers of applied behavior analysis to
publicly aided individuals pursuant to section 10H of this chapter. Said review shall include, but
not be limited to:
(a) a comparison of payment rates paid to providers in jurisdictions with similar cost-of-
living indexes;
(b) payment rates’ effect on recruitment and retention of qualified providers during the
previous 5 fiscal years;
of 2

(c) increased cost of service delivery to comply with future accreditation or regulatory
requirements;
(d) any services or eligible populations which were not mandated prior to the last rate
review that may increase demand for services.
In each year the review is conducted the office shall report the findings of the review to
(i) the clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate; (ii) the chairs of the House and
Senate committees on ways and means; and (iii) the chairs of the Joint Committee on Health
Care Financing not later than October 1 of the year prior to the release of updated rate
regulations promulgated in accordance of this section.
of 2